Montana, session 2025, HB431.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 3-1-1115, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-1-1115. Legislative nomination panel. (1) There is a nomination panel made up of members of
the house of representatives for the purposes of providing recommendations to the speaker of the house about
appointments made as provided in 3-1-1101(1)(a). Within 3 days of the start of each regular legislative session,
the speaker of the house shall appoint three representatives to the legislative nomination panel. The panel must
have at least one member from the minority party. If a vacancy occurs on the panel, the speaker may appoint a
replacement.
(2) When a vacancy occurs or a vacancy is anticipated to occur due to the expiration of a term on
the judicial standards commission in a position appointed as provided in 3-1-1101(1)(a), the speaker of the
house shall notify the district court judges, who shall present the nomination panel with a list of all district court
judges who are willing to serve as a commissioner. After consideration of the judges' qualifications, the
nomination panel shall forward no fewer than three names to the speaker of the house, who shall select a
commissioner from that pool of names.
(3) Members of the nomination panel serve until the start of the first regular session after their
appointment unless they are reappointed.
(4) The nomination panel may meet between regular sessions of the legislature to fill vacancies."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 431
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 431
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 431
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 431, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 431
INTRODUCED BY G. OVERSTREET
AN ACT ALLOWING THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES TO APPOINT A PERSON TO
FILL CERTAIN ANTICIPATED VACANCIES ON THE JUDICIAL STANDARDS COMMISSION; AMENDING
SECTION 3-1-1115, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”